Massachusetts, session 194th, H4338.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 16 of chapter 176O of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof the
following subsections:
(c) Carriers are prohibited from reducing the payment of a negotiated rate for evaluation
and management or procedural services under a participating provider agreement that are
furnished by a participating provider and that are otherwise covered services solely because the
provider also billed other health care services, including but not limited to minor surgery, on the
same day as the evaluation and management or procedural services. Any provision of a provider
agreement that allows for a reduction in reimbursement as prohibited by this subsection shall be
void.
(d) With respect to an insured enrolled in a health benefit plan under which the carrier or
utilization review organization only provides administrative services, the obligations of a carrier
of 2

or utilization review organization created by this section and related to payment shall be limited
to recommending to the third party payor that coverage should be authorized.
of 2